en: Dental mouthgard recommended use: Bruxism; Orthodontic protection; Post-dental surgery protection; Sleep apnea; Snoring reduction; Sports; Teeth grinding; Teeth whitening; Temporomandibular joint disorders (TMJ); Other
fi: Hammassuojaa suositellaan käytettäväksi: Bruksismi; Ortodonttinen suoja; Hammasleikkauksen jälkeinen suoja; Uniapnea; Kuorsauksen vähentäminen; Urheilu; Hampaiden narskuttelu; Hampaiden valkaisu; Temporomandibulaarisen nivelen häiriöt (TMJ); Muu
it: Uso consigliato del paradenti dentale: Bruxismo; Protezione ortodontica; Protezione post-intervento odontoiatrico; Apnea notturna; Riduzione del russamento; Sport; Digrignare i denti; Sbiancante per denti; Disturbi dell'articolazione temporo-mandibolare (ATM); Altro
bg-BG: Препоръчителна употреба на дентален протектор за уста: Бруксизъм; Ортодонтска защита; Защита след стоматологична операция; Сънна апнея; Намаляване на хъркането; Спорт; Скърцане със зъби; Избелване на зъби; Нарушения на темпоромандибуларната става (TMJ); Други
ja: 歯科用マウスガードの推奨使用法: 歯ぎしり; 歯列矯正用保護材; 歯科手術後の保護材; 睡眠時無呼吸; いびきの軽減; スポーツ; 歯ぎしり; 歯のホワイトニング; 顎関節症 (TMJ); その他
sk-SK: Odporúčané použitie chrániča zubov: Bruxizmus; Ortodontická ochrana; Ochrana po zubnom zákroku; Spánkové apnoe; Zmiernenie chrápania; Šport; Škrípanie zubov; Bielenie zubov; Poruchy temporomandibulárneho kĺbu (TMJ); Iné
hr-HR: Preporučena uporaba štitnika za zube: Bruksizam; Ortodontska zaštita; Zaštita nakon stomatološke operacije; Apneja za vrijeme spavanja; Smanjenje hrkanja; Sport; Škripanje zubima; Izbjeljivanje zubi; Poremećaji temporomandibularnog zgloba (TMJ); Ostalo
el: Συνιστώμενη χρήση προστατευτικού στόματος (μασελάκι): Βρυγμός; Ορθοδοντική προστασία; Προστασία μετά την επέμβαση; Υπνική άπνοια; Μείωση του ροχαλητού; Αθλητισμός; Τρίξιμο των δοντιών; Λεύκανση δοντιών; Διαταραχές της κροταφογναθικής άρθρωσης (TMJ); Άλλο
de: Empfohlene Verwendung von Zahnschutz: Bruxismus; Kieferorthopädischer Schutz; Schutz nach zahnärztlichen Eingriffen; Schlafapnoe; Schnarchreduzierung; Sportarten; Zähneknirschen; Zahnaufhellung; Erkrankungen des Kiefergelenks (TMJ); Sonstiges
ru: Назначение стоматологической капы: Бруксизм; Ортодонтическая защита; Защита после стоматологических операций; Апноэ во сне; Уменьшение храпа; Спорт; Скрежетание зубами; Отбеливание зубов; Заболевания височно-нижнечелюстного сустава (ВНЧС); Другое
pt-BR: Uso recomendado de protetor bucal dental: Bruxismo; Proteção ortodôntica; Proteção pós-cirurgia odontológica; Apneia do sono; Redução do ronco; Esportes; Ranger os dentes; Branqueamento dental; Distúrbios da articulação temporomandibular (ATM); Outro
ko: 권장 치과용 마우스가드 사용: 이갈이; 치아교정 보호; 치과 수술 후 보호; 수면 무호흡; 코골이 감소; 스포츠; 이갈이; 치아 미백; 악관절 장애(TMJ); 기타
ro-RO: Utilizare recomandată pentru protecția dentară: Bruxism; Protecție ortodontică; Protecție post-chirurgie dentară; Apnee în somn; Reducerea sforăitului; Sport; Scrâșnirea dinților; Albirea dinților; Tulburări ale articulației temporo-mandibulare (ATM); Altele
da: Anbefalet brug for tandbeskytter: Bruxisme; Ortodontisk beskyttelse; Beskyttelse efter tandkirurgi; Søvnapnø; Reduktion af snorken; Sport; Tænderskæren; Tandblegning; Temporomandibulære ledlidelser (TMJ); Andet
es: Uso recomendado de la férula dental: Bruxismo; Protección dental; Protección post-cirugía dental; Apnea del sueño; Reducción de ronquidos; Deportes; Rechinamiento de los dientes; Blanqueamiento dental; Trastornos de la articulación temporomandibular (ATM); Otros
zh-CN: 牙套推荐用途: 磨牙症; 正畸保护; 牙科手术后保护; 睡眠呼吸暂停; 减少打鼾; 体育; 磨牙; 牙齿美白; 颞下颌关节紊乱; 其他
th: การใช้ที่แนะนำสำหรับฟันยางกันกระแทก: การนอนกัดฟัน; ป้องกันเหล็กจัดฟันบาดปาก; การป้องกันหลังการผ่าตัดทางทันตกรรม; การหยุดหายใจขณะหลับ; ลดการนอนกรน; กีฬาต่างๆ; การบดฟัน; การฟอกฟันขาว; ความผิดปกติของข้อต่อขากรรไกร (TMJ); อื่นๆ
pl: Zalecane zastosowanie ochraniaczy zębów: Bruksizm; Ochrona ortodontyczna; Ochrona po zabiegu stomatologicznym; Bezdech senny; Redukcja chrapania; Sport; Zgrzytanie zębami; Wybielanie zębów; Zaburzenia stawu skroniowo-żuchwowego; Inne
vi: Máng bảo vệ miệng khuyên dùng: Bệnh nghiến răng; Bảo vệ chỉnh nha; Bảo vệ sau phẫu thuật nha khoa; Chứng ngưng thở lúc ngủ; Giảm ngáy; Thể thao; Nghiến răng; Làm trắng răng; Rối loạn khớp thái dương hàm (TMJ); Khác
lt-LT: Rekomenduojama dantų kapos paskirtis: Bruksizmas; Ortodontinė apsauga; Apsauga po odontologinių operacijų; Miego apnėja; Knarkimo slopinimas; Sportas; Dantų griežimas; Dantų balikliai; Smilkininio apatinio žandikaulio sąnario sutrikimai (TMJ); Kita
nb: Bittskinne anbefalt bruk: Bruxism; Ortodontisk beskyttelse; Beskyttelse etter tannkirurgi; Søvnapné; Reduksjon av snorking; Sport; Sliping av tenner; Tannbleking; Temporomandibulære leddsykdommer (TMJ); Annet
sl-SI: Priporočena uporaba zobnih ščitnikov: Bruksizem; Ortodontska zaščita; Zaščita po zobozdravstvenem posegu; Apneja v spanju; Zmanjšanje smrčanja; Šport; Škripanje z zobmi; Beljenje zob; Bolezni temporomandibularnega sklepa (TMJ); Drugo
fr: Utilisation recommandée du protège-dents: Bruxisme; Protection orthodontique; Protection post-chirurgie dentaire; Apnée du sommeil; Réduction du ronflement; Sports; Grincement des dents; Blanchiment des dents; Troubles de l’articulation temporo-mandibulaire (ATM); Autre
hu: A fogászati szájvédő javasolt használata: Fogcsikorgatás; Fogszabályozási védelem; Fogászati műtétek utáni védelem; Alvási apnoé; Horkolás csökkentése; Sport; Fogcsikorgatás; Fogfehérítés; Temporomandibularis ízületi rendellenességek (TMJ); Egyéb
tr: Diş ağızlığı önerilen kullanım: Bruksizm; Ortodontik koruma; Diş ameliyatı sonrası koruma; Uyku apnesi; Horlama azaltma; Spor dalları; Diş gıcırdatma; Diş Beyazlatıcı; Temporomandibular eklem rahatsızlıkları (TME); Diğer
pt-PT: Uso recomendado de protetor bucal: Bruxismo; Proteção ortodôntica; Proteção pós-cirurgia odontológica; Apneia do sono; Redução do ronco; Desportivo; Ranger os dentes; Branqueamento dos dedos; Distúrbios da articulação temporomandibular (ATM); Outro
zh-TW: 牙科護齒推薦使用: 磨牙症; 矯正防護; 牙科手術後防護; 睡眠呼吸中止症; 減少打鼾; 體育; 磨牙; 牙齒美白; 顳顎關節疾病 (TMJ); 其他
cs: Doporučené použití zubního chrániče: Bruxism; Ortodontická ochrana; Ochrana po stomatochirurgickém zákroku; Spánková apnoe; Redukce chrápání; Sporty; Skřípání zubů; Bělení zubů; Poruchy temporomandibulárního kloubu (TMJ); Jiné
nl: Aanbevolen gebruik mondbescherming: Bruxisme; Orthodontische bescherming; Bescherming na een tandheelkundige ingreep; Slaapapneu; Vermindering van snurken; Sporten; Tandenknarsen; Tanden bleken; Temporomandibulaire gewrichtsaandoeningen (TMJ); Andere
sv: Rekommenderad användning av tandskydd: Bruxism; Ortodontiskt skydd; Skydd efter tandkirurgi; Sömnapné; Reducering av snarkning; Sporter; Tandgnisslande; Tandblekning; Störningar i temporomandibulära leder (TMJ); Övrigt